Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7305.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 38-2-1, 38-2-2, 38-2-3, 38-2-3.2, 38-2-3.16, 38-2-4, 38-2-7, 38-2-9,
38-2-14 and 38-2-15 of the General Laws in Chapter 38-2 entitled "Access to Public Records" are
hereby amended to read as follows:
38-2-1. Purpose.
The public’s right to access to public records and the individual’s right to dignity and
privacy are both recognized to be principles of the utmost importance in a free society. The purpose
of this chapter is to facilitate public access to public records. It is also the intent of this chapter to
protect from disclosure information about particular individuals maintained in the files of public
bodies when disclosure would constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy as specified
by the exemptions contained in this chapter.
38-2-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Agency” or “public body” means any executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory, or
administrative body of the state, or any political subdivision thereof; including, but not limited to:
any department, division, agency, commission, board, office, bureau, authority; any school, fire, or
water district, or other agency of Rhode Island state or local government that exercises
governmental functions; any authority as defined in § 42-35-1(b); or any other public or private
agency, person, partnership, corporation, or business entity acting on behalf of and/or in place of
any public agency, and also include the police department of any private educational institution of

higher learning employing any special police officers pursuant to § 12-2.1-1 or peace officers as
defined in § 12-7-21.
(2) “Chief administrative officer” means the highest authority of the public body.
(3) “Public business” means any matter over which the public body has supervision,
control, jurisdiction, or advisory power.
(4) “Public record” or “public records” shall mean all documents, papers, letters, maps,
books, tapes, photographs, films, sound recordings, magnetic or other tapes, electronic data
processing records, computer stored data (including electronic mail messages, except specifically
for any electronic mail messages of or to elected officials with or relating to those they represent
and correspondence of or to elected officials in their official capacities as otherwise exempt under
this chapter), or other material regardless of physical form or characteristics made or received
pursuant to law or ordinance or in connection with the transaction of official business by any
agency. For the purposes of this chapter, and subject to the provisions of § 38-2-3(b), the following
records shall not be deemed public:
(A)(I)(a)(i) All records relating to a client/attorney relationship and to a doctor/patient
relationship, including all medical records and information protected by state or federal healthcare
confidentiality laws relating to an individual in any files.
(ii) All records protected by the attorney-client privilege or attorney work product
privilege.
(b) Personnel and other personal individually identifiable records otherwise deemed
confidential by federal or state law or by federal law or regulation, or the disclosure of which would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy pursuant to 5 U.S.C. § 552 et seq.;
provided, however, with respect to employees, and employees of contractors and subcontractors
working on public works projects that are required to be listed as certified payrolls, the name, gross
salary, salary range, total cost of paid fringe benefits, gross amount received in overtime, and any
other remuneration in addition to salary, job title, job description, dates of employment and
positions held with the state, municipality, or public works contractor or subcontractor on public
works projects, employment contract, work location, and/or project, business telephone number,
the city or town of residence, and date of termination shall be public. For the purposes of this section
“remuneration” shall include any payments received by an employee as a result of termination, or
otherwise leaving employment, including, but not limited to, payments for accrued sick and/or
vacation time, severance pay, or compensation paid pursuant to a contract buy-out provision. For
purposes of this section, the city or town residence shall not be deemed public for peace officers,
as defined in § 12-7-21, and shall not be released. For purposes of this section, "employee" means
LC004375 - Page 2 of 15

those individuals currently employed by a public body and those previously employed by a public
body.
(II) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, or any other provision of the general
laws to the contrary, the pension records of all persons who are either current or retired members
of any public retirement systems, as well as all persons who become members of those retirement
systems after June 17, 1991, shall be open for public inspection. “Pension records” as used in this
section, shall include all records containing information concerning pension and retirement benefits
of current and retired members of the retirement systems and future members of said systems,
including all records concerning retirement credits purchased and the ability of any member of the
retirement system to purchase retirement credits, but excluding all information regarding the
medical condition of any person and all information identifying the member’s designated
beneficiary or beneficiaries unless and until the member’s designated beneficiary or beneficiaries
have received or are receiving pension and/or retirement benefits through the retirement system.
(B) Trade secrets and commercial or financial information obtained from a person, firm,
or corporation that is of a privileged or confidential nature.
(C) Child custody and adoption records, records of illegitimate births, and records of
juvenile proceedings before the family court.
(D) All records maintained by law enforcement agencies for criminal law enforcement and
all records relating to the detection and investigation of crime, including those maintained on any
individual or compiled in the course of a criminal investigation by any law enforcement agency.
Provided, however, such records shall not be deemed public only to the extent that the disclosure
of the records or information (a) Could reasonably be expected to interfere with investigations of
criminal activity or with enforcement proceedings; (b) Would deprive a person of a right to a fair
trial or an impartial adjudication; (c) Could reasonably be expected to constitute an unwarranted
invasion of personal privacy; (d) Could reasonably be expected to disclose the identity of a
confidential source, including a state, local, or foreign agency or authority, or any private institution
that furnished information on a confidential basis, or the information furnished by a confidential
source; (e) Would disclose techniques and procedures for law enforcement investigations or
prosecutions, or would disclose guidelines for law enforcement investigations or prosecutions; or
(f) Could reasonably be expected to endanger the life or physical safety of any individual. Records
relating to management and direction of a law enforcement agency and records or reports reflecting
and describing the initial arrest of an adult and the charge or charges brought against an adult shall
be public. A police report of an incident that does not lead to an arrest shall not be deemed
presumptively exempt from disclosure.
LC004375 - Page 3 of 15

(I) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any final reports of investigations
conducted by internal affair units or their equivalent, regardless of how or by whom the
investigation was initiated, shall be public records; provided, however, names, addresses and other
personal identifiers may be redacted from the reports to the extent their disclosure would constitute
a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy. The name and underlying activity of any law
enforcement officer who has been found to have engaged in misconduct that has required
prosecutorial disclosure to a criminal defendant shall be public. Provided, however, no personally
identifiable information shall be released to the extent its release would be in conflict with chapter
28.6 of title 42 (the "law enforcement officers' bill of rights").
(II) All police body-worn camera recordings shall be subject to this chapter; provided,
however, any recordings of incidents involving police use of force in which an investigation is
ongoing shall be made available within thirty (30) days of a request in full or redacted form.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, a law enforcement agency may petition the superior court for a
twenty (20) day extension if it can demonstrate that release within the thirty (30) day period would
substantially interfere with completion of its investigation.
(E) Any records that would not be available by law or rule of court to an opposing party in
litigation.
(F) Scientific and technological secrets and the security plans of military and law
enforcement agencies, the disclosure of which would endanger the public welfare and security.
(G) Any records that disclose the identity of the contributor of a bona fide and lawful
charitable contribution to the public body whenever public anonymity has been requested of the
public body with respect to the contribution by the contributor.
(H) Reports and statements of strategy or negotiation involving labor negotiations or
collective bargaining.
(I) Reports and statements of strategy or negotiation with respect to the investment or
borrowing of public funds, until such time as those transactions are entered into.
(J) Any minutes of a meeting of a public body that are not required to be disclosed pursuant
to chapter 46 of title 42.
(K) Preliminary drafts, notes, impressions, memoranda, working papers, and work
products, including those involving research at state institutions of higher education on commercial,
scientific, artistic, technical, or scholarly issues, whether in electronic or other format; provided,
however, any documents submitted at a public meeting of a public body shall be deemed public the
designation of a record as a draft may not be used to circumvent the requirements of this chapter
and may be subject to challenge.
LC004375 - Page 4 of 15

(L) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a licensing
examination, examination for employment or promotion, or academic examinations; provided,
however, that a person shall have the right to review the results of his or her examination.
(M) Correspondence of or to elected officials with or relating to those they represent and
correspondence of or to elected officials in their official capacities that has no demonstrable
connection to the exercise of official acts or duties.
(N) The contents of real estate appraisals, engineering, or feasibility estimates and
evaluations made for or by an agency relative to the acquisition of property or to prospective public
supply and construction contracts, until such time as all of the property has been acquired or all
proceedings or transactions have been terminated or abandoned; provided the law of eminent
domain shall not be affected by this provision.
(O) All tax returns.
(P) All investigatory records of public bodies, with the exception of law enforcement
agencies, pertaining to possible violations of statute, rule, or regulation other than records of final
actions taken, provided that all records prior to formal notification of violations or noncompliance
shall not be deemed to be public, except that, upon good cause shown, such records may be released
upon the completion of formal notification.
(Q) Records of individual test scores on professional certification and licensing
examinations; provided, however, that a person shall have the right to review the results of his or
her examination.
(R) Requests for advisory opinions until such time as the public body issues its opinion.
(S) Records, reports, opinions, information, and statements required to be kept confidential
by federal law or regulation or state law or rule of court; provided that, the public body shall provide
a citation to the law, regulation or rule relied upon in withholding any records under this exception.
(T) Judicial bodies are included in the definition only in respect to their administrative
function provided that records kept pursuant to the provisions of chapter 16 of title 8 are exempt
from the operation of this chapter.
(U) Library records that, by themselves or when examined with other public records, would
reveal the identity of the library user requesting, checking out, or using any library materials.
(V) Printouts from TELE — TEXT devices used by people who are deaf or hard of hearing
or speech impaired.
(W) All records received by the insurance division of the department of business regulation
from other states, either directly or through the National Association of Insurance Commissioners,
if those records are accorded confidential treatment in that state. Nothing contained in this title or
LC004375 - Page 5 of 15

any other provision of law shall prevent or be construed as prohibiting the commissioner of
insurance from disclosing otherwise confidential information to the insurance department of this
or any other state or country, at any time, so long as the agency or office receiving the records
agrees in writing to hold it confidential in a manner consistent with the laws of this state.
(X) Credit card account numbers in the possession of state or local government are
confidential and shall not be deemed public records.
(Y) Any documentary material, answers to written interrogatories, or oral testimony
provided under any subpoena issued under § 9-1.1-6. Notwithstanding this provision and absent a
court order to the contrary, a subpoena issued by a governmental entity to a public body or a public
official regarding official business shall be a public record.
(Z) Any individually identifiable evaluations of public school employees made pursuant to
state or federal law or regulation.
(AA) All documents prepared by school districts intended to be used by school districts in
protecting the safety of their students from potential and actual threats.
(BB) The list of teachers terminated for good and just cause maintained by the department
of education pursuant to § 16-13-9.
38-2-3. Right to inspect and copy records — Duty to maintain minutes of meetings —
Procedures for access.
(a) Except as provided in § 38-2-2(4), all records maintained or kept on file by stored by
or for any public body, whether or not those records are required by any law or by any rule or
regulation, and regardless of physical location, shall be public records and every person or entity
shall have the right to inspect and/or copy those records at such reasonable time as may be
determined by the custodian thereof.
(b) Any reasonably segregable portion of a public record excluded by § 38-2-2(4),
including the reasonably segregable portion of any record deemed confidential pursuant to any
other state law, shall be available for public inspection after the deletion of the information which
is the basis of the exclusion. If an entire document or record is deemed non-public, the public body
shall state in writing that no portion of the document or record contains reasonable segregable
information that is releasable. In withholding any document or any portion of a document, the
public body shall identify the amount of information withheld and the exemption under which it
was withheld, and in the case of redactions, the exemption under which any redaction is made shall
be indicated on the released portion of the record or shall be clearly delineated in a privilege log
that reasonably apprises the requester of the specific basis for the redaction of any particular
document.
LC004375 - Page 6 of 15

(c) All documents to be discussed at an open meeting of a public body shall be posted or
linked with the electronic filing of the agenda submitted to the secretary of state pursuant to § 42-
46-6(f). Notwithstanding the provisions of § 38-2-2(4), any documents reviewed, considered, or
submitted at a public meeting of a public body shall be deemed public and shall also be made
available upon request to any member of the public present at the meeting.
(c)(d) Each public body shall make, keep, and maintain written or recorded minutes of all
meetings.
(d)(e) Each public body shall establish written procedures regarding access to public
records but shall not require written requests for public information available pursuant to § 42-35-
2 or for other documents prepared for or readily available to the public, including any documents
reviewed, considered, or submitted at a public meeting of a public body.
These procedures must include, but need not be limited to, the identification of a designated
public records officer or unit, how to make a public records request, and where a public record
request should be made, and a copy of these procedures shall be posted on the public body’s website
if such a website is maintained and shall be made otherwise readily available to the public. The
unavailability of a designated public records officer shall not be deemed good cause for failure to
timely comply with a request to inspect and/or copy public records pursuant to subsection (e). A
link to the public body's procedures shall be prominently displayed on the home page of its website,
including a link to the appropriate webpage if the public body requires that requests be submitted
to another public body of the state or municipality. A written request for public records need not
be made on a form established by a public body if the request is otherwise readily identifiable as a
request for public records. The procedures shall allow requests for public records to be submitted
in person, by regular and electronic mail and, at the public body's discretion, by fax or online portal.
(f) A requester's failure to follow the written procedures established by a public body shall
not, by itself, serve as a basis to fail to comply with a request for public records.
(g) If a request for records is sent to a public body other than through the designated public
records officer or unit, the recipient of the request shall be responsible for forwarding it to the
designated officer or unit. In such circumstances, the public body shall have an additional five (5)
days to respond to the request, notwithstanding the provisions of § 38-2-7, but shall not be found
in violation of this chapter for responding beyond this timeframe if the public body has acted in
good faith in responding.
(e)(h) A public body receiving a request shall permit the inspection or copying within ten
(10) business days after receiving a request. If the inspection or copying is not permitted within ten
(10) business days, the public body shall forthwith explain in writing the need for additional time
LC004375 - Page 7 of 15

to comply with the request. Any such explanation must be particularized to the specific request
made. In such cases the public body may have up to an additional twenty (20) business days to
comply with the request if it can demonstrate with specificity that the voluminous nature of the
request, the number of requests for records pending (in which case the number of pending requests
shall be cited in the response), or the difficulty in searching for and retrieving or copying the
requested records, is such that additional time is necessary to avoid imposing an undue burden on
the public body. The response times established by this subsection, §§ 38-2-3.2(a), and 38-2-
2(4)(D)(II) may be further extended only with the explicit written consent of the requester.
(i) The unavailability of a designated public records officer shall not be deemed good cause
for failure to timely comply with a request to inspect and/or copy public records pursuant to
subsection (h) of this section.
(f)(j) If a public record is in active use or in storage and, therefore, not available at the time
a person or entity requests access, the custodian shall so inform the person or entity and make an
appointment for the person or entity to examine such records as expeditiously as they may be made
available.
(g)(k) Any person or entity requesting copies of public records may elect to obtain them in
any and all media in which the public agency is capable of providing them. Any public body which
maintains its records in a computer storage system shall provide any data properly identified in a
printout or other reasonable format, as requested, including a format allowing the documents to be
searchable electronically where feasible.
(h)(l) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a public body to reorganize,
consolidate, or compile data not maintained by the public body in the form requested at the time
the request to inspect the public records was made except to the extent that such records are in an
electronic format and the public body would not be unduly burdened in providing such data.
(i)(m) Nothing in this section is intended to affect the public record status of information
merely because it is stored in a computer.
(j)(n) No public records shall be withheld based on the purpose for which the records are
sought, nor shall a public body require, as a condition of fulfilling a public records request, that a
person or entity provide a reason for the request or provide personally identifiable information
about him/herself.
(k)(o) At the election of the person or entity requesting the public records, the public body
shall provide copies of the public records electronically, by facsimile, or by mail in accordance
with the requesting person or entity’s choice, unless complying with that preference would be
unduly burdensome due to the volume of records requested or the costs that would be incurred. The
LC004375 - Page 8 of 15

person requesting delivery shall be responsible for the actual cost of delivery, if any.
(p) Any provision in a contractual or other agreement entered into by a public body with a
third party that purports to keep records confidential that are otherwise public under this chapter
shall be deemed null and void; nor shall a public body delegate to a private party the determination
as to what information provided by that party is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.
38-2-3.2. Arrest logs.
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 38-2-3(e), the following information reflecting an
initial arrest of an adult and charge or charges shall be made available within forty-eight (48) hours
after receipt of a request unless a request is made on a weekend or holiday, in which event the
information shall be made available within seventy-two (72) hours, to the extent such information
is known by the public body:
(1) Full name of the arrested adult;
(2) Home address of the arrested adult, unless doing so would identify a crime victim;
(3) Year of birth of the arrested adult;
(4) Charge or charges;
(5) Date of the arrest;
(6) Time of the arrest;
(7) Gender of the arrested adult;
(8) Race of the arrested adult; and
(9) Name of the arresting officer, unless doing so would identify an undercover officer.
(b) The provisions of this section shall apply to arrests made within five (5) thirty (30) days
prior to the request, and the attorney general shall prepare a uniform log form for public bodies to
use to facilitate compliance with this section.
38-2-3.16. Compliance by agencies and public bodies.
Not later than January 1, 2013, and annually thereafter, the chief administrator of each
agency and each public body shall state in writing to the attorney general that all officers and
employees who have the authority to grant or deny persons or entities access to records under this
chapter have been provided orientation and training regarding this chapter. The attorney general
may, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42, promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to implement the requirements of this section, and shall annually, and not later than
March 1, post online a list of those public bodies that have provided the statement required by this
section, and those public bodies that, having submitted a statement in any previous year, have failed
to do so for the current year.
38-2-4. Cost.
LC004375 - Page 9 of 15

(a) Subject to the provisions of § 38-2-3, a public body must allow copies to be made or
provide copies of public records. The cost per copied page of written documents provided to the
public shall not exceed fifteen cents ($.15) five cents ($.05) per page for documents copyable on
common business or legal size paper. A public body may not charge more than the reasonable
actual cost for providing electronic records or retrieving records from storage where the public
body is assessed a retrieval fee.
(b) A reasonable charge may be made for the search or retrieval of documents. Hourly costs
for a search and retrieval shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) per hour and no costs shall be
charged for the first hour two (2) hours of a search or retrieval or for the first two (2) hours used
for the redaction of documents. No charge shall be imposed for the denial of a request for records.
For the purposes of this subsection, multiple requests from any person or entity to the same public
body within a thirty (30) day time period shall be considered one request.
(c) Copies of documents shall be provided and the search and retrieval of documents
accomplished within a reasonable time after a request. A public body upon request, shall provide
an estimate of the costs of a request for documents prior to providing copies.
(d) Upon request, the public body shall provide a detailed itemization of the costs charged
for search and retrieval.
(e) A public body, the attorney general, and the court may shall reduce or waive the fees
for costs charged for search or retrieval if it determines that the requester demonstrates that the
information requested is in the public interest because it is likely to contribute significantly to public
understanding of the operations or activities of the government and affirms that the request is not
primarily in the commercial interest of the requester. Any requester denied a reduction or waiver
of fees, or seeking to contest the amount of a reduction, by a public body or the attorney general
may file suit pursuant to the provisions of § 38-2-9. The matter shall be reviewed de novo by the
court.
38-2-7. Denial of access.
(a) Any denial of the right to inspect or copy records, in whole or in part provided for under
this chapter shall be made to the person or entity requesting the right in writing giving the specific
reasons for the denial within ten (10) business days of the request and indicating the procedures for
appealing the denial. Except for good cause shown, any reason not specifically set forth in the
denial shall be deemed waived by the public body.
(b) Failure to comply with a request to inspect or copy the public record within the ten (10)
business day period shall be deemed to be a denial. Except that for good cause shown, this limit
may be extended in accordance with the provisions of § 38-2-3(e) 38-2-3(h). All copying and search
LC004375 - Page 10 of 15

and retrieval fees shall be waived if a public body fails to produce requested records in a timely
manner; provided, however, that the production of records shall not be deemed untimely if the
public body is awaiting receipt of payment for costs properly charged under § 38-2-4.
(c) A public body that receives a request to inspect or copy records that do not exist or are
not within its custody or control shall, in responding to the request in accordance with this chapter,
state that it does not have or maintain the requested records.
38-2-9. Jurisdiction of superior court.
(a) Jurisdiction to hear and determine civil actions brought under this chapter is hereby
vested in the superior court.
(b) The court may examine any record which is the subject of a suit in camera to determine
whether the record or any part thereof may be withheld from public inspection under the terms of
this chapter.
(c) Actions brought under this chapter may be advanced on the calendar upon motion of
any party, or sua sponte by the court made in accordance with the rules of civil procedure of the
superior court.
(d) The court shall impose a civil fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000) four
thousand dollars ($4,000) against a public body or official found to have committed a knowing
and willful violation of this chapter, and a civil fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000)
two thousand dollars ($2,000) against a public body found to have recklessly violated this chapter
and shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing plaintiff. In the instance of a
court having found a knowing and willful violation, the court may also, taking into consideration
any delays in the prosecution and appeal of a request denial, impose a fine of up to one hundred
dollars ($100) per day for each day that records were improperly withheld, and may further award
compensatory and punitive damages. The court shall further order a public body found to have
wrongfully denied access to public records to provide the records at no cost to the prevailing party;
provided, further, that in the event that the court, having found in favor of the defendant, finds
further that the plaintiff’s case lacked a grounding in fact or in existing law or in good faith
argument for the extension, modification, or reversal of existing law, the court may award
attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing defendant. A judgment in the plaintiff’s favor shall not
be a prerequisite to obtaining an award of attorney’s fees and/or costs if the court determines that
the defendant’s case lacked grounding in fact or in existing law or a good faith argument for
extension, modification or reversal of existing law.
(e) Any civil fines imposed under this section shall be placed in a restricted receipt account
of the state and shall be used to provide grants to municipalities to support information technology
LC004375 - Page 11 of 15

capabilities that will increase the public's online access to public records.
38-2-14. Information relating to settlement of legal claims.
Settlement agreements of any legal claims against or by a governmental entity shall be
deemed public records.
38-2-15. Reported violations.
Every year the attorney general shall prepare a report summarizing all the complaints
received pursuant to this chapter, which shall be submitted to the legislature and which shall include
information as to how many complaints were found to be meritorious and the action taken by the
attorney general in response to those complaints. The attorney general shall publish on a keyword
searchable website the full text of all findings and decisions issued by the attorney general in
response to those complaints, all advisory opinions issued under this chapter, and the annual reports
issued pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 38-2 of the General Laws entitled "Access to Public Records" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
38-2-17. Vexatious requests.
(a) If a person makes a request to view or copy a public record that is part of a series of
contemporaneous requests filed with the intent to disrupt government operations, the chief
administrative officer of the public body may petition the superior court for an order to relieve the
custodian of the records from fulfilling the request.
(b) A chief administrative officer shall not petition a court for relief unless the officer or
the custodian of the records has provided in writing to the person making the request the specific
reasons that the request is considered an attempt to disrupt government operations in violation of
this section, and the person has continued to engage in such conduct after the notification. Reliance
solely on the number of requests filed or the number of records sought shall not be a basis for
deeming the request an intent to disrupt government operations.
(c) After a petition is filed and while the case is pending, the records custodian shall
continue to comply with the request, but if the chief administrative officer prevails, the person
making the requests shall reimburse the custodian for the reasonable costs incurred in producing
the records during the pendency of the case, in accordance with § 38-2-4.
(d) A court may, upon finding by clear and convincing evidence that a records request was
made with the intent to disrupt government operations, issue an order authorizing the custodian of
the records to ignore the request that is the subject of the complaint.
(e) Upon a second finding that a person has filed a request with the intent to disrupt
government operations, a court may provide additional appropriate relief including, but not limited
LC004375 - Page 12 of 15

to, an order that the custodian of the records need not comply with future requests from the person
for a specified period of time, but not to exceed one year.
(f) If a complaint brought under this section is dismissed by the court or the chief
administrative officer without a requisite finding of an attempt to disrupt government operations,
the requester of the records shall be entitled to an award of reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs. If
the court determines that the complaint lacked grounding in fact or law, the requester shall in
addition be entitled to an award of damages not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).
38-2-18. Traffic accident and improvement data.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or state law, any records that, under 23
U.S.C. § 407, are not discoverable or admissible in court proceedings or allowed to be considered
for other purposes in damages actions shall nonetheless be deemed public records; provided,
however, the records may not be used for purposes prohibited by that federal statute. When making
the records public, whether in response to a request pursuant to this chapter or otherwise, a public
body may provide written notice of the aforementioned restrictions on their use.
38-2-19. Preferred license plates.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or state law, and to the extent not
prohibited by the Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. § 2721 through § 2725 the
names of any individuals who obtain a preferred license plate shall be a public record available
upon request. A "preferred license plate" means a license plate of one to four (4) digits, or a
combination of one to two (2) letters and one to three (3) digits, whose issuance is approved by, or
subject to the approval of, the office of the governor.
SECTION 3. Section 39-21.1-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-21.1 entitled "911
Emergency Telephone Number Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-21.1-17. Confidentiality of calls.
(a) All telephone calls and telephone call transmissions, including electronic text message,
photos or videos, received pursuant to this chapter and all tapes containing records of telephone
calls shall remain confidential and used only for the purpose of handling emergency calls and for
public safety purposes as may be needed for law enforcement, fire, medical, rescue or other
emergency services. The calls shall not be released to any other parties without the written consent
of the caller whose voice is recorded, or upon order of the court.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, calls shall be released to third parties:
(1) Upon good cause shown;
(2) Upon order of the court; or
(3) Upon request, to:
LC004375 - Page 13 of 15

(i) The individual placing the call;
(ii) Any individual who is heard on the call communicating information to or for the
emergency responder or operator; and
(iii) The subject(s) of the call who required emergency services or, if they are incapacitated
or deceased, their next of kin.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004375
========
LC004375 - Page 14 of 15